Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Regular Elections

118.305.
Persons entitled to have name on ballot — Certification of names of candidates — Eligibility of candidates defeated in primary — Notification of vacancy in elective office — Ineligibility of Senior Status Special Judge.

Except as provided in KRS

118.345

, and subject to the provisions of subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, the county clerk of each county shall cause to be printed on all ballots, including the absentee ballots, for the regular election the names of the following persons:

Candidates of a political party, as defined in KRS

118.015

, who have received certificates of nomination at the preceding primary, or certificates of nomination under KRS

118.185

, and whose certificates of nomination have been filed with the Secretary of State or the appropriate county clerk;

Candidates of a political party, as defined in KRS

118.015

, who have been nominated for an unexpired term in a manner determined by the governing authority of the party, as provided in KRS

118.115

, and whose evidences of nomination have been filed with the Secretary of State or the appropriate county clerk within the time prescribed in this chapter;

Candidates of a political party, as defined in KRS 118.015, who have been nominated by the governing authority of the party to fill a vacancy in the candidacy of a person nominated at the preceding primary, as provided in KRS

118.105

, and whose certificates of nomination have been filed with the Secretary of State or the appropriate county clerk, by at least the date provided by the election law generally for such filing;

Candidates who have been nominated by a political organization as provided in KRS

118.325

and whose certificates or petitions of nomination have been filed with the Secretary of State or the appropriate county clerk within the time prescribed in this chapter;

Independent candidates who have been nominated by petition as provided in KRS

118.315

, and whose petitions of nomination have been filed with the Secretary of State or the appropriate county clerk within the time prescribed in this chapter;

Successful nominees of all nonpartisan primaries which shall have been conducted;

Candidates who have filed a petition of candidacy as shall be required to fill a vacancy which shall appear on the ballot;

The county clerk shall determine whether the name of any replacement candidate who has been nominated as provided in KRS

118.105

(5) may be placed on the ballot and whether any voting equipment may be reprogrammed to count the votes cast for that candidate, or whether the ballot must be reprinted to accommodate votes cast for any replacement candidate, and shall take the appropriate action to accommodate the replacement of any candidate. If the county clerk determines that the name of any replacement candidate cannot be accommodated on the existing ballot and if there is insufficient time before the election to reprint the entire ballot, the county clerk shall request approval to use supplemental paper ballots for voting for that office only in the same manner as permitted for other situations in KRS 118.215(5), and, if approved, shall have an adequate number of supplemental paper ballots printed for voting for that office and only votes cast for that office by means of the supplemental paper ballots shall be tabulated and recorded by the precinct election officers and county board of elections. All actions by a county clerk, the State Board of Elections, and the Secretary of State which are necessary to provide for voting at a regular election for candidates nominated pursuant to KRS 118.105(5) shall be carried out with all possible speed. When a candidate has been replaced as provided in KRS 118.105(5) after absentee and federal provisional absentee ballots have been printed and distributed for the regular election, neither the precinct election officers nor the county board of elections shall tabulate or record any absentee or federal provisional absentee votes cast for the candidate who was replaced. If ballots are reprinted or supplemental paper ballots are printed, or if voting equipment must be reprogrammed to count the votes cast for a replacement candidate, the costs for the printing and reprogramming shall be paid by the political party who has nominated a replacement candidate, or proportionately by each political party if each party nominates a replacement candidate;

Candidates for President and Vice President of the United States, of those political parties and organizations who have nominated presidential electors as provided in KRS

118.325

, if the certificate of nomination of the electors has been filed with the Secretary of State within the time prescribed in this chapter;

Candidates for soil and water district supervisors who have been nominated by petition as provided in KRS

262.210

; and

Candidates for city office for which no nonpartisan primary has been conducted in a city which requires nonpartisan city elections.

Any candidate for city office who is defeated in a partisan or nonpartisan primary shall be ineligible as a candidate for the same office in the regular election.

Candidates for members of boards of education shall have their names printed on ballots, including absentee ballots, for the regular election only after filing as provided in KRS

160.220

.

Except as provided in KRS

118.105

and

118.115

, no candidate’s name shall be printed upon any ballots, including federal provisional ballots, federal provisional absentee ballots, and absentee ballots for any regular election as the nominee of any political party, as defined in KRS

118.015

, or under the emblem of any political party, as so defined, except those candidates who have been duly and regularly nominated as nominees of that party at a primary held as provided in this chapter.

No county clerk shall knowingly cause to be printed, upon the ballots, federal provisional ballots, federal provisional absentee ballots, or absentee ballots for any regular election, the name of any candidate of a political party, as defined in KRS

118.015

, who has not been nominated in the manner provided in the laws governing primaries or the name of any candidate who is not in compliance with the restrictions concerning party registration and candidacy provided in of KRS 118.315(1).

The names of candidates for President and Vice President shall be certified in lieu of certifying the names of the candidates for presidential electors.

When a vacancy occurs in an elective office which is required by law to be filled temporarily by appointment, the officer or body designated by law to make the appointment, or in the case of an office to be filled by appointment from a list of nominations, the officer or body designated by law to make the nominations, shall immediately notify in writing both the county clerk and Secretary of State of the vacancy.

A judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with KRS

21.580

shall not become a candidate or a nominee for any elected office during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS

21.580

(1)(a)1., regardless of the number of days served by the judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 116; 1982, ch. 394, § 25, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 185, § 16, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 287, § 13, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 36, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 44, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 366, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 482, § 2, effective April 13, 1994; 2007, ch. 46, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 66, § 4, effective June 25, 2013; 2020 ch. 89, § 28, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 52, effective June 29, 2021.

118.310.
Ballot
not voted — Spoiled ballot. [Repealed.]

118.315.
Nomination for regular election by petition — Form of petition — Examination of petition — Ineligibility of Senior Status Special Judge.

A candidate for any office to be voted for at any regular election may be nominated by a petition of electors qualified to vote for him or her, complying with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. No person whose registration status is as a registered member of a political party shall be eligible to election as an independent, or political organization, or political group candidate, nor shall any person be eligible to election as an independent, or political organization, or political group candidate whose registration status was as a registered member of a political party on January 1 immediately preceding the regular election for which the person seeks to be a candidate. This restriction shall not apply to candidates to those offices specified in KRS 118.105(7), for supervisor of a soil and water conservation district, for candidates for mayor or legislative body in cities of the home rule class, or to candidates participating in nonpartisan elections.

The form of the petition shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections. It shall be signed by the candidate and by registered voters from the district or jurisdiction from which the candidate seeks nomination. The petition shall include a declaration, sworn to by the candidate, that he or she possesses all the constitutional and statutory requirements of the office for which the candidate has filed. Signatures for a petition of nomination for a candidate seeking any office, excluding President of the United States in accordance with KRS 118.591(1), shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot. Signatures for nomination papers shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot. A petition of nomination for a state officer, or any officer for whom all the electors of the state are entitled to vote, shall contain five thousand (5,000) petitioners; for a representative in Congress from any congressional district, or for any officer from any other district except as herein provided, four hundred (400) petitioners; for a county officer, member of the General Assembly, or Commonwealth’s attorney, one hundred (100) petitioners; for a soil and water conservation district supervisor, twenty-five (25) petitioners; for a city officer or board of education member, two (2) petitioners; and for an officer of a division less than a county, except as herein provided, twenty (20) petitioners. It shall not be necessary that the signatures of the petition be appended to one (1) paper. Each petitioner shall include the date he or she affixes the signature, address of residence, and date of birth. Failure of a voter to include the signature affixation date, date of birth, and address of residence shall result in the signature not being counted. If any person joins in nominating, by petition, more than one (1) nominee for any office to be filled, he or she shall be counted as a petitioner for the candidate whose petition is filed first, except a petitioner for the nomination of candidates for soil and water conservation district supervisors may be counted for every petition to which his or her signature is affixed.

Titles, ranks, or spurious phrases shall not be accepted on the filing papers and shall not be printed on the ballots as part of the candidate’s name; however, nicknames, initials, and contractions of given names may be accepted as the candidate’s name.

The Secretary of State and county clerks shall examine the petitions of all candidates who file with them to determine whether each petition is regular on its face. If there is an error, the Secretary of State or the county clerk shall notify the candidate by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours of filing.

A judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with KRS

21.580

shall not become a candidate or a nominee for any elected office during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS

21.580

(1)(a)1., regardless of the number of days served by the judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 117; 1978, ch. 318, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 394, § 26, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 185, § 17, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 287, § 14, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 470, § 27, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 17, § 11, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 45, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 166, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 304, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 2, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 243, § 2, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 275, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 53, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 71, § 8, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 187, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 79, § 13, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 123, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 66, § 5, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 92, § 213, effective January 1, 2015.

118.320.
Provisions
for insuring secrecy of ballot. [Repealed.]

118.325.
Nomination by convention or primary — Vacancies — Nominees by petition — Ineligibility of Senior Status Special Judge.

Any political organization not constituting a political party within the meaning of KRS

118.015

but whose candidate received two percent (2%) of the vote of the state at the last preceding election for presidential electors may nominate, by a convention or primary held by the party in accordance with its constitution and bylaws, candidates for any offices to be voted for at any regular election, except the office of member of a board of education, for which nominations shall be made as provided in KRS

160.220

. Any political party, as defined in KRS

118.015

, and any political organization not constituting such a political party but whose candidate received two percent (2%) of the vote of the state at the last preceding election for presidential electors, may nominate, by a convention or primary held by the party or organization in accordance with its constitution and bylaws, as many electors of President and Vice President of the United States as this state is entitled to elect.

The certificate of nomination by such a convention or primary shall be in writing, shall contain the name of each person nominated, his or her residence, and the office to which he or she is nominated, and shall designate a title for the party or principle that such convention or primary represents, together with any simple figure or device by which its list of candidates may be designated on the ballots. The certificate shall be signed by the presiding officer and secretary of the convention, or by the chair and secretary of the county, city, or district committee, who shall add to their signatures their respective places of residence, and acknowledge the same before an officer duly authorized to administer oaths. A certificate of the acknowledgment shall be appended to the certificate of nomination. In the case of electors of President and Vice President of the United States the certificate of nomination shall state the names of the candidates of the party for President and Vice President.

Any person desiring to become a candidate for an office, the nomination to which is to be made by a convention pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, except for the office of elector of President and Vice President of the United States, shall file a statement with the official designated in KRS

118.165

with whom notification and declaration forms are filed for the office. The form of the statement shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections. Such statement shall be filed as prescribed by KRS

118.365

.

If the certificate of nomination of any state convention requests that the figure or device selected by such convention be used to designate the candidates of such party on the ballots for all elections throughout the state, that figure or device shall be used until changed by request of a subsequent state convention of the same party. The device may be any appropriate symbol other than the coat of arms or seal of this state or of the United States, the national flag, or any other emblem common to the people at large.

In case of death, resignation, or removal of any such candidate subsequent to nomination and before the certification of candidates for the regular election made under KRS

118.215

, the chair of the state, county, or city district committee shall fill the vacancy, unless a supplemental certificate or petition of nomination is filed. In the case of electors of President and Vice President of the United States, a vacancy may be filled by the chair of the state committee at any time before the meeting of the electors, whether the vacancy occurs before or after the election.

If any political party entitled to nominate by convention fails to do so, the names of all nominees by petition for any office who are designated in their petition as members and candidates of that party shall be printed under the device and title on the ballots as if nominated by a convention. If two (2) or more persons who have filed certificates of nomination under this section claim to be the nominee of the same political party, the governing authority of that party shall designate to the Secretary of State and county clerk, in writing, which of the candidates is entitled to the party emblem. If there are two (2) or more contending executive committees of the same party in the county or district, the county or district executive committee that is recognized by the state governing authority of the party, by the written certificate of its chair, shall be recognized by the Secretary of State and county clerk.

A judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with KRS

21.580

shall not become a candidate or a nominee for any elected office during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS

21.580

(1)(a)1., regardless of the number of days served by the judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 118; 1984, ch. 185, § 18, effective January 1, 1985; 1988, ch. 17, § 12, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 46, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 2, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2013, ch. 66, § 6, effective June 25, 2013; 2021 ch. 197, § 53, effective June 29, 2021.

118.327.
Registers
of candidates to be chosen by convention — Display of information on Web site.

Each county clerk and the Secretary of State shall keep a book in which he or she shall enter certain information concerning candidates to be chosen by convention. Such book shall include the name, place of residence, office for which the person is a candidate, party designation, and the date of the receipt of the form required to be filed by KRS 118.325(3). Such book shall be a public record.

The county clerk of each county, within five (5) business days following the date of receiving the form required by KRS 118.325(3), shall:

Transmit a candidate’s information derived from subsection (1) of this section to the Secretary of State; and

Prominently display a candidate’s information derived from subsection (1) of this section on the clerk’s official Web site.

The Secretary of State shall prominently display a candidate’s information, derived from subsection (1) of this section, on the Secretary of State’s official Web site within five (5) business days following the date of receiving the form required by KRS 118.325(3) or within five (5) days following the receipt of the candidates information supplied by the county clerk, whichever is applicable. The information displayed shall be derived from the Secretary’s book and from each book held by the county clerk of each county within this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 185, § 1, effective January 1, 1985; 2022 ch. 219, § 9, effective July 14, 2022.

118.330.
Persons
to keep away from polls — Electioneering at polls prohibited. [Repealed.]

118.335.
Effect
of conflicting certificates and petitions of nomination.

If any certificate or petition
of nomination made under the provisions of this chapter contains the name
of more than one (1) candidate for any office to be filled, neither name shall
be printed as a candidate for that office. If any person has been nominated
as a candidate for any office by primary election or by party convention,
and also by petition, his name shall be placed in the list of candidates nominated
by the primary or convention, and the place occupied by his name in the petition
shall be left blank, unless the candidate makes written request, prior to
the last day for filing evidences of nomination, that his name be printed
as nominated by petition and be omitted from the list nominated by the primary
or convention.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 119; 1976, ch. 54, § 26, effective March 10, 1976.

118.340.
Employees
to be allowed time off to vote. [Repealed.]

118.345.
Certain primary candidates barred from having names on regular election ballots — Section not applicable to presidential preference primary candidates.

No candidate who has been defeated for the nomination for any office in a primary shall have his or her name placed on ballots in the succeeding regular election as a candidate for the same office for the nomination to which he or she was a candidate in the primary, except that if a vacancy occurs in the party nomination for which he or she was a candidate in the primary his or her name may be placed on the ballots for the regular election as a candidate of that party if he or she has been duly made such party nominee after the vacancy occurs as provided in KRS

118.105

.

No person who was a candidate for nomination for any office in a primary and who, before the succeeding regular election, is declared by the judgment of any court of competent jurisdiction to have violated, in the primary, any provision of KRS Chapter 121, or to be responsible for such violation by others, shall have his or her name placed on ballots for any office to be voted for in the succeeding regular election.

This section does not apply to presidential preference primary candidates.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 120; 1976, ch. 54, § 27, effective March 10, 1976; 1982, ch. 394, § 27, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 64, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 185, § 19, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 29, § 14, effective July 15, 1986; 2021 ch. 197, § 54, effective June 29, 2021.

118.350.
Closing
polls — Delivery of ballot boxes and election supplies to county clerks.
[Repealed.]

118.355.
Disposition
of secondary stubs. [Repealed.]

118.356.
Filing
of certificates and petitions of nomination.

Certificates and petitions of nomination shall, in the case of candidates voted for by the state at large or by a district greater than one (1) county, be filed with the Secretary of State. In the case of candidates voted for by a county or by a district less than a county, they shall be filed with the county clerk. In the case of candidates voted for by a city whose boundaries extend beyond those of a single county, they shall be filed with the county clerk of the county in which a candidate resides. In the case of candidates for Congress and for General Assembly, they shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

Certificates of nomination at a primary election held under this chapter shall be filed by the State Board of Elections or the county board of elections, depending upon which one issued the certificate. Certificates and petitions of nomination shall be filed by the candidate or by someone on his behalf.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 121; 1990, ch. 169, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 354, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

118.360.
Guarding
ballot boxes and envelopes before meeting of election commissioners. [Repealed.]

118.365.
Time for filing certificates and petitions of nomination — Statement-of-candidacy forms — Petitions for recall elections or elections on public questions.

Certificates of nomination issued by the State Board of Elections shall be filed by that board with the Secretary of State immediately. The certificates issued by the county board of elections shall be filed by that board with the county clerk immediately.

Petitions of nomination for candidates for city offices except as provided in KRS

83A.047

, for candidates for members of boards of education, and for candidates for supervisors of soil and water conservation districts shall be filed with the county clerk not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot and not later than the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the day fixed by law for the holding of regular elections for the offices sought.

Candidates for an office, the nomination to which is to be made by a convention pursuant to KRS 118.325(1) and (2), except for the office of electors of President and Vice President of the United States, shall file the statements required by KRS 118.325(3), with the official designated in KRS

118.165

with whom notification and declaration are filed for the office, not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot and not later than the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the regular election for the office sought.

Certificates of nomination made by the governing authority of a political party within the meaning of KRS

118.015

or a political organization not constituting a political party within the meaning of KRS

118.015

but whose candidate received two percent (2%) of the vote of the state at the last preceding election for presidential electors to fill vacancies in office, as provided in KRS

118.115

and

118.325

, shall be filed as required with the Secretary of State or county clerk.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, petitions of nomination shall be filed as required with the Secretary of State or county clerk not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the offices will appear on the ballot and not later than the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the day fixed by law for the holding of regular elections for the offices sought. The filing of petitions of nomination for independent, or political organization, or political group candidates shall not be accepted by the Secretary of State or the county clerk if the candidate has not filed a statement-of-candidacy form as required by KRS

118.367

.

Petitions and certificates of nomination for electors of President and Vice President of the United States shall be filed with the Secretary of State not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which there is an election for President and Vice President of the United States and not later than the Friday following the first Tuesday in September preceding the date fixed by law for the election of the electors.

Petitions for recall elections or elections on public questions shall be filed as required with the county clerk not later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the day fixed by law for holding a regular election.

Petitions of any kind named in this section, statements, and certificates of nomination shall be filed no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last date on which papers are permitted to be filed.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 122; 1978, ch. 384, § 254, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 394, § 28, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 185, § 20, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 185, § 21, effective January 2, 1985; 1986, ch. 185, § 2, effective January 1, 1987; 1986, ch. 470, § 28, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 238, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 47, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 169, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 476 Pt. V, § 305, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 12, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 195, § 17, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 2, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 92, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 133, § 3, effective April 5, 2007; 2010, ch. 123, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 162, § 7, effective November 7, 2018; 2022 ch. 87, § 20, effective April 7, 2022.

118.367.
Statement-of-candidacy form for independent, political organization, or political group candidate — Exceptions — Examination of forms.

An independent, or political organization, or political group candidate required to file nomination papers pursuant to KRS 118.365(5) shall be required to file a statement-of-candidacy form with the same office at which nomination papers are filed. Candidates for federal office and candidates for mayor or legislative body in cities of the home rule class participating in partisan elections shall not be required to file a statement-of-candidacy form. The statement-of-candidacy form shall be filed not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot and not later than April 1 preceding the day fixed by law for holding of regular elections for the offices sought. If the office in which the statement-of-candidacy form is to be filed is closed on April 1, the form may be filed on the next business day. The statement-of-candidacy form shall be filed no later than 4 p.m. local time when filed on the last day on which papers are permitted to be filed. No person shall file a statement-of-candidacy form for more than one (1) public office during an election cycle.

The statement-of-candidacy form shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The statement-of-candidacy form shall be signed by the candidate upon filing. No charge shall be assessed for the filing of a statement-of-candidacy form. The Secretary of State and county clerks shall examine the statement-of-candidacy form of each candidate who files the form to determine if there is an error. If an error has occurred, the candidate shall be notified by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 92, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 71, § 9, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 123, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 92, § 214, effective January 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 23, § 1, effective March 19, 2019; 2019 ch. 187, § 14, effective November 6, 2019; 2021 ch. 197, § 77, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(11/6/2019). This statute was amended by
2019 Ky. Acts chs. 23 and
187. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 23, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under
KRS

446.250

.

118.370.
County
board of election commissioners to canvass election returns. [Repealed.]

118.375.
Independent, political organization, or political group candidates filing to fill vacancy — Ineligibility of Senior Status Special Judge.

If a vacancy occurs in any elective office less than one hundred sixty (160) days before the primary or at any time before the time prescribed in KRS

118.365

for filing petitions of nomination, independent, or political organization, or political group candidates may file their petitions at the time and place provided in KRS

118.365

, subject to the restrictions concerning party registration and candidacy provided in KRS 118.315(1).

If a vacancy occurs in any elective office after the time prescribed in KRS

118.365

for filing petitions of nomination, but not less than three (3) months before the regular election, independent, or political organization, or political group candidates may file their petitions not later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the regular election for the office sought, subject to the restrictions concerning party registration and candidacy provided in KRS 118.315(1).

A judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with KRS

21.580

shall not become a candidate or a nominee for any elected office during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS

21.580

(1)(a)1., regardless of the number of days served by the judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 123; 1984, ch. 185, § 22, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 287, § 15, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 48, effective July 13, 1990; 2010, ch. 123, § 5, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 66, § 7, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 162, § 8, effective November 7, 2018; 2019 ch. 187, § 11, effective November 6, 2019.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a county sheriff died on or about May 3, 1975,
which was too late for candidates to file and run in the May primary for the
unexpired term, the major parties were authorized to make nominations for
the November election pursuant to party rules under KRS

118.115

and, at the
same time, any qualified person could file a petition to become an independent
candidate for the office in question at the coming November election under
the authority expressed in this section so that any person desiring to run
as an independent must file a petition on a form prescribed by the state board
which is in accordance with the requirements of KRS

118.315

.

OAG 75-401

.

If the mayor of a fourth-class city resigns his office
in January of 1979 or at any time less than 70 days before the May primary
(May 29), party nominations would have to be made at the May primary for the
November election, which would be an election for an unexpired term, but candidates
for the vacancy could run as independents by filing not less than 55 days
before the November election.

OAG 78-784

.

The 120-day filing deadline established in KRS

118.165

,

118.365

and

118A.060

was meant to uniformly apply to all filing deadlines,
except those for municipal offices, and therefore by implication applies to
candidates seeking unexpired terms under the provisions of this section and
KRS

118.115

and

118A.100

.

OAG 89-5

.

118.380.
Parties
may designate inspectors to witness count. [Repealed.]

118.385.
Preservation
of certain voting records.

The Secretary of State and county clerks shall preserve in their respective offices all certificates and petitions of nomination filed therein, for six (6) months after the election for which the nominations were made.

Each county clerk and the Secretary of State shall retain and preserve, for a period of twenty-two (22) months from the date of any primary or general or special election at which candidates for the office of presidential elector or member of the United States Senate or House of Representatives are voted for, and only for the precincts in which any such office appears on the ballot all records and papers relative to the voter returns for all the offices voted for in those precincts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 124; 1986, ch. 470, § 29, effective July 15, 1986.

118.387.
Posting of candidate information to Web site by county clerk and Secretary of State.

The county clerk of each county and the Secretary of State shall prominently display on his or her official Web site, the candidates, place of residence of each candidate, and the political affiliation of each candidate, who is on the ballot for any regular election. The posting required by this section shall occur at least fifty (50) days before a regularly scheduled election and forty-five (45) days before a special election.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 219, § 11, effective July 14, 2022.

118.390.
Return
of keys to ballot boxes, stub books and ballots — Preservation and disposal
of election papers. [Repealed.]

118.395.
Arrangement
of judicial ballot. [Repealed.]

118.400.
County
board to issue certificates of election, certify votes. [Repealed.]

118.405.
Name of candidate to appear on ballot but once — Exceptions for filling of vacancy.

No candidate’s name shall appear on any ballot, including any federal provisional ballot, federal provisional absentee ballot, or absentee ballot more than once, except that a candidate’s name may appear twice if he or she is a candidate for a primary or a regular election and also a candidate to fill a vacancy in the same office required to be filled at a special election, when the special election to fill a vacancy is scheduled for the regular election day.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 126; 1976, ch. 54, § 28, effective March 10, 1976; 1986, ch. 470, § 30, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 49, effective July 13, 1990; 2020 ch. 89, § 29, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 55, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A candidate may not run for the offices of police
court judge and city councilman in the same election.

OAG 75-554

.

Inasmuch as this section prohibits any candidate’s
name from appearing on any voting machine or special ballot more than once,
a candidate for the unexpired term for the office of magistrate could not
cross-file.

OAG 76-179

.

A person cannot have his name placed on the November
ballot in 1979 as the party nominee for State Representative or Senator and
at the same time have his name placed on said ballot as an independent candidate
for the office of Governor.

OAG 79-3

.

118.410.
Form
of certificate of election and certificate of returns. [Repealed.]